vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít: Mũi khoan & Mũi vít; Cây nối dài mũi khoan; Dụng cụ mài mũi khoan; Đầu kẹp mũi khoan; Giá treo khoan và hướng dẫn; Cưa cắt lỗ
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Bohrzubehör: Bohrer & Bits; Bohrerverlängerungen; Bohrerschleifgeräte; Bohrfutter; Bohrständer & -führungen; Lochsägen
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses: Forets et embouts de tournevis; Extensions de forets; Affûteuses de forets; Mandrins; Supports et guides de perçage; Scie cloche
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para furadeiras: Brocas para furadeiras; Extensões para brocas; Afiadores de brocas; Mandris para furadeiras; Suportes e guias para furadeiras; Serras-copo
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件: 钻头/螺丝刀头; 钻头延长杆; 钻头研磨机; 钻夹头; 钻架和导引架; 孔锯/开孔锯
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Bor – tilbehør: Borebit; Borebit – forlængere; Borebit – slibere; Borepatron; Borestativer og styreskinner; Hulsave
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike: Nastavki za vrtalnike in vijačnike; Podaljški za svedre; Brusilniki za svedre; Vpenjalne glave za vrtalnike; Stojala in vodila za vrtalnike; Žage luknjarice
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Accessories: Drill & Screwdriver Bits; Drill Bit Extensions; Drill Bit Sharpeners; Drill Chucks; Drill Stands & Guides; Hole Saws
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k vrtačkám: Vrtáky; Nástavce na vrtáky; Ostřiče vrtáků; Sklíčidla pro vrtačky; Stojany na vrtačku; Pily děrovky
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง: ดอกสว่านและดอกไขควง; หัวต่อดอกสว่าน; ที่ลับดอกสว่าน; หัวจับดอกสว่าน; แท่นจับสว่าน; โฮลซอว์
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per trapani e cacciavite: Punte di trapano e cacciavite; Adattatori e estensioni per punte di trapano; Affilatori per punte di trapano; Mandrini; Guide e supporti per punte; Sega a tazza
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών: Μύτες τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών; Επεκτάσεις μύτης τρυπανιών; Ακονιστήρια για μύτες τρυπανιών; Σφικτήρες τρυπανιού; Βάσεις & οδηγοί τρυπανιών; Κυλινδρικά πριόνια
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти: Накрайници за бормашини и винтоверти; Удължители за свредла; Точила за свредла; Патронници за бормашина; Стойки и водачи за бормашини; Фрези за кръгли отвори
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere: Bits for driller og skrutrekkere; Forlengelser for drillbits; Slipere for drillbits; Drillchucks; Drillstativer og -fester; Hullsager
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai: Grąžtai ir atsuktuvų antgaliai; Grąžtų ilgintuvai; Grąžtų galąstuvai; Gręžtuvų galvutės; Gręžimo stovai ir kreiptuvai; Skylių pjūklai
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları: Matkap ve Tornavida Uçları; Matkap Ucu Uzatma Adaptörleri; Matkap Ucu Bileme Makineleri; Matkap Bağlama Aynaları; Matkap Stantları ve Kılavuzları; Delik Testereleri
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ドリル関連用品: ドリルビット; ドリルビット延長ロッド; ドリル研磨機; ドリルチャック; ドリルスタンド・ドリルガイド; ホールソー
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom: Vrtáky a skrutkovače; Nadstavce vrtákov; Brúsky na vrtáky; Vŕtacie skľučovadlá; Stojany a vodiče na vŕtačky; Kruhové pílky
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za bušilice i odvijače: Svrdla za bušilice i odvijače; Nastavci za svrdla; Oštrila za svrdla; Stezne glave za bušilice; Stalci i vodilice za bušilice; Krunske pile
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe: Burghie și șurubelnițe; Extensii burghie; Dispozitive de ascuțit burghie; Mandrine de găurit; Suporturi și ghidaje pentru burghie; Ferăstraie pentru găuri
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet: Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen kärjet; Poranterien jatkovarret; Poranterien teroittimet; Poraistukat; Poratelineet ja ohjaimet; Reikäsahat
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 電鑽/電動起子配件: 鑽頭; 鑽頭延伸部; 鑽頭研磨機; 電鑽夾頭; 電鑽支架/導引架; 鋸孔器
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare: Borr- och skruvdragarbits; Borrförlängningar; Borrslipmaskiner; Borrchuck; Borrmaskinställ och borrstativ; Hålsågar
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품: 드릴/드라이버 날; 드릴날 연장 바; 드릴날 연마기; 드릴 척; 드릴 스탠드/가이드; 원통 톱
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores: Brocas de taladro y cabezales de destornillador; Extensiones para brocas de taladro; Afiladores para brocas; Portabrocas; Bases y guías para taladros; Sierras perforadoras
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas: Pontas de berbequim e chave de fendas; Extensões de pontas de berbequim; Afiadores de pontas de berbequim; Mandris de berbequim; Guias e apoios de berbequim; Serras cranianas
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők: Fúró és csavarhúzó bitek; Fúróbit-kiterjesztések; Fúróbit-élezők; Fúrótokmányok; Fúróállványok és -vezetők; Lyukfűrészek
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do wiercenia: Wiertła; Przedłużenia do wierteł; Ostrzałki do wierteł; Głowice do wiertarek; Stojaki i prowadnice do wiertarek; Otwornice
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Booraccessoires: Boortjes; Boorverlengstukken; Boorslijpers; Boorhouders; Boorstandaards en -geleiders; Gatenzagen
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов: Сверла для дрелей и биты для шуруповертов; Удлинители для сверл; Инструменты для заточки сверл; Патроны для крепления сверл; Сверлильные стойки и направляющие; Кольцевые пилы